Washington statutes.
RCW 19.225.030

Athlete agents—Delivery of disclosure form required.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, an individual may not act as an athlete agent in this state unless on the day of initial contact with any student athlete the athlete agent delivers to the student athlete the athlete agent disclosure form as required by RCW 19.225.040.

(2) An individual may act as an athlete agent before delivering an athlete agent disclosure form for all purposes except signing an agency contract if:

(a) A student athlete or another person acting on behalf of the athlete initiates communication with the individual; and

(b) Not later than seven days after an initial act as an athlete agent, the individual delivers an athlete agent disclosure form to the student athlete.

(3) An agency contract resulting from conduct in violation of this section is void, and the athlete agent shall return any consideration received under the contract.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 13 s 3; 2002 c 131 s 4.]